Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1202.01
Appropriations; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that present state appropriations on behalf of community-based services to persons with developmental disabilities are inadequate to pay the reasonable costs of providing such services to all Nebraskans who are eligible to receive them.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the state pursue full funding of community-based developmental disability programs in a reasonable timeframe and that the Legislature commit itself and the state to attaining the goal of providing services to all eligible persons by July 1, 2010.

Laws 1994, LB 1136, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 297, § 1.